lexd_components/hye-eanc_countries.lexd
LEXICON NounCountryUnreducible
Ալա:Ալա
Բետպակ\ Դալա:Բետպակ\ Դալա
Զաքաթալա:Զաքաթալա
Ախթալա:Ախթալա
Մախաչկալա:Մախաչկալա
Գվատեմալա:Գվատեմալա
Կամպալա:Կամպալա
Ուպսալա:Ուպսալա
Մուսալա:Մուսալա
Կերալա:Կերալա
Դուալա:Դուալա
Պուեբլա:Պուեբլա
Քեմբլա:Քեմբլա
Սմելա:Սմելա
Վենեսուելա:Վենեսուելա
Իլա:Իլա
Բրաիլա:Բրաիլա
Բրեիլա:Բրեիլա
Մանիլա:Մանիլա
Վիլա:Վիլա
Փորտ\ Վիլա:Փորտ\ Վիլա
Մակլա:Մակլա
Միկլուխո-Մակլա:Միկլուխո-Մակլա
Հեկլա:Հեկլա
Զահլա:Զահլա
Շիմլա:Շիմլա
Սիմլա:Սիմլա
Ռումայլա:Ռումայլա
Էր-Ռումայլա:Էր-Ռումայլա
Անգոլա:Անգոլա
Կոլա:Կոլա
Տոլա:Տոլա
Գեռլա:Գեռլա
Գովեռլա:Գովեռլա
Վիսլա:Վիսլա
Կորչուլա:Կորչուլա
Պուլա:Պուլա
Տուլա:Տուլա
Տաբին\ Բոգդո\ Օլա:Տաբին\ Բոգդո\ Օլա
Յոշկար\ Օլա:Յոշկար\ Օլա
Տանու\ Օլա:Տանու\ Օլա
Մեսոյախա:Մեսոյախա
Բալաշիխա:Բալաշիխա
Բելոկուրիխա:Բելոկուրիխա
Ախալցխա:Ախալցխա
Բելուխա:Բելուխա
Օխա:Օխա
Տիտիկակա:Տիտիկակա
Օստյակա:Օստյակա
Չուքիսակա:Չուքիսակա
Լուսակա:Լուսակա
Օսակա:Օսակա
Կառնատակա:Կառնատակա
Մակեևկա:Մակեևկա
Իվանտեևկա:Իվանտեևկա
Կադիևկա:Կադիևկա
Պետրո-Մարիևկա:Պետրո-Մարիևկա
Ռուզայևկա:Ռուզայևկա
Սնեժկա:Սնեժկա
Տանգանիկա:Տանգանիկա
Դոմինիկա:Դոմինիկա
Կոստա\ Ռիկա:Կոստա\ Ռիկա
Կորսիկա:Կորսիկա
Մեքսիկա:Մեքսիկա
Արկտիկա:Արկտիկա
Անտարկտիկա:Անտարկտիկա
Արիկա:Արիկա
Ամերիկա:Ամերիկա
Աֆրիկա:Աֆրիկա
Կազինցբարցիկա:Կազինցբարցիկա
Շիլկա:Շիլկա
Մալակկա:Մալակկա
Ճամայկա:Ճամայկա
Խանտայկա:Խանտայկա
Կուրեյկա:Կուրեյկա
Բանկա:Բանկա
Շրի\ Լանկա:Շրի\ Լանկա
Բահիա\ Բլանկա:Բահիա\ Բլանկա
Կասաբլանկա:Կասաբլանկա
Խանկա:Խանկա
Բրյանկա:Բրյանկա
Զիրյանկա:Զիրյանկա
Կամենկա:Կամենկա
Ժմերենկա:Ժմերենկա
Երզնկա:Երզնկա
Կրաինկա:Կրաինկա
Ուկրաինկա:Ուկրաինկա
Դուդինկա:Դուդինկա
Շեբելինկա:Շեբելինկա
Կլուժ-Նապոկա:Կլուժ-Նապոկա
Ռոկա:Ռոկա
Ֆուկուոկա:Ֆուկուոկա
Վելիչկա:Վելիչկա
Շիպկա:Շիպկա
Սոպկա:Սոպկա
Կլյուչևսկայա\ Սոպկա:Կլյուչևսկայա\ Սոպկա
Կրոնոցկայա\ Սոպկա:Կրոնոցկայա\ Սոպկա
Իչինսկացա\ Սոպկա:Իչինսկացա\ Սոպկա
Կորյակական\ Սոպկա:Կորյակական\ Սոպկա
Ալուպկա:Ալուպկա
Աթաբասկա:Աթաբասկա
Ալյասկա:Ալյասկա
Տունգուսկա:Տունգուսկա
Պոդկամեննայա\ Տունգուսկա:Պոդկամեննայա\ Տունգուսկա
Գոռլավկա:Գոռլավկա
Միխայլովկա:Միխայլովկա
Կախովկա:Կախովկա
Դրուժկովկա:Դրուժկովկա
Չեսնոկովկա:Չեսնոկովկա
Կոնստանտինովկա:Կոնստանտինովկա
Շեպետովկա:Շեպետովկա
Վյատկա:Վյատկա
Կամչատկա:Կամչատկա
Կուրիլ-Կամչատկա:Կուրիլ-Կամչատկա
Սատկա:Սատկա
Կոտկա:Կոտկա
Շոստկա:Շոստկա
Իգարկա:Իգարկա
Ինդիգիրկա:Ինդիգիրկա
Մայորկա:Մայորկա
Մալյորկա:Մալյորկա
Մենորկա:Մենորկա
Բանցա\ Լուկա:Բանցա\ Լուկա
Օկա:Օկա
Օմահա:Օմահա
Հոնգհա:Հոնգհա
Դոհա:Դոհա
Սագարմատհա:Սագարմատհա
Ջուղա:Ջուղա
Ալաբամա:Ալաբամա
Լամա:Լամա
Կամա:Կամա
Ատակամա:Ատակամա
Բահամա:Բահամա
Վակայամա:Վակայամա
Օկայամա:Օկայամա
Ֆուձիյամա:Ֆուձիյամա
Տոյամա:Տոյամա
Մացույամա:Մացույամա
Մանամա:Մանամա
Պանամա:Պանամա
Ջոմոլնինգմա:Ջոմոլնինգմա
Սուլեմա:Սուլեմա
Կլյազմա:Կլյազմա
Վյազմա:Վյազմա
Իժմա:Իժմա
Զիմա:Զիմա
Լիմա:Լիմա
Կալիմա:Կալիմա
Կոլիմա:Կոլիմա
Կագոսիմա:Կագոսիմա
Հիրոսիմա:Հիրոսիմա
Ցուսիմա:Ցուսիմա
Պալմա:Պալմա
Բուգուլմա:Բուգուլմա
Օլյոկմա:Օլյոկմա
Պիշմմա:Պիշմմա
Գլոմմա:Գլոմմա
Սայմա:Սայմա
Կինեշմա:Կինեշմա
Պիշմա:Պիշմա
Վերխնյայա\ Պիշմա:Վերխնյայա\ Պիշմա
Տուլոմա:Տուլոմա
Թակոմա:Թակոմա
Օկլահոմա:Օկլահոմա
Կոստրոմա:Կոստրոմա
Պարմա:Պարմա
Բուխտարմա:Բուխտարմա
Բիրմա:Բիրմա
Կումա:Կումա
Ռովումա:Ռովումա
Ռուվումա:Ռուվումա
Ստրումա:Ստրումա
Այա:Այա
Սուրաբայա:Սուրաբայա
Բորզայա:Բորզայա
Մեգհալայա:Մեգհալայա
Մալայա:Մալայա
Բելայա:Բելայա
Բելսկո-Բելայա:Բելսկո-Բելայա
Ցխակայա:Ցխակայա
Միխացխակայա:Միխացխակայա
Ակչակայա:Ակչակայա
Վիսոկայա:Վիսոկայա
Կոմսոմոլսկայա:Կոմսոմոլսկայա
Պիոներսկայա:Պիոներսկայա
Մայա:Մայա
Մոլոդյոժնայա:Մոլոդյոժնայա
Մագնիտնայա:Մագնիտնայա
Լիեպայա:Լիեպայա
Լոզովայա:Լոզովայա
Ուզլովայա:Ուզլովայա
Չուսովայա:Չուսովայա
Մենամ\ Չաո\ Պրայա:Մենամ\ Չաո\ Պրայա
Արագուայա:Արագուայա
Օրադյա:Օրադյա
Անգիլյա:Անգիլյա
Պրեգոլյա:Պրեգոլյա
Շումեռլյա:Շումեռլյա
Մանսելկյա:Մանսելկյա
Տատաբանյա:Տատաբանյա
Ագանյա:Ագանյա
Լոբնյա:Լոբնյա
Ինյա:Ինյա
Գդինյա:Գդինյա
Բոլոնյա:Բոլոնյա
Լոպասնյա:Լոպասնյա
Տրիստան\ դա\ Կունյա:Տրիստան\ դա\ Կունյա
Լա\ Կորունյա:Լա\ Կորունյա
Օրոյա:Օրոյա
Սանմինսյա:Սանմինսյա
Դիվյա:Դիվյա
Կաշկադարյա:Կաշկադարյա
Կարադարյա:Կարադարյա
Սուրխանդարյա:Սուրխանդարյա
Սիրդարյա:Սիրդարյա
Ամուդարյա:Ամուդարյա
Գաույա:Գաույա
Շույա:Շույա
Գանա:Գանա
Ֆերգանա:Ֆերգանա
Ադանա:Ադանա
Թանա:Թանա
Գվադիանա:Գվադիանա
Ինդիանա:Ինդիանա
Լուիզիանա:Լուիզիանա
Լուդհիանա:Լուդհիանա
Գվիանա:Գվիանա
Պալանա:Պալանա
Կիտվե-Նկանա:Կիտվե-Նկանա
Տոսկանա:Տոսկանա
Տուրկանա:Տուրկանա
Արղանա:Արղանա
Գայանա:Գայանա
Լյուբլյանա:Լյուբլյանա
Հարյանա:Հարյանա
Թանանա:Թանանա
Քուինանա:Քուինանա
Սանա:Սանա
Հավանա:Հավանա
Բոտսվանա:Բոտսվանա
Մոնտանա:Մոնտանա
Կուստանա:Կուստանա
Պարանա:Պարանա
Տիրանա:Տիրանա
Պուտորանա:Պուտորանա
Դուբնա:Դուբնա
Ենա:Ենա
Լենա:Լենա
Մագդալենա:Մագդալենա
Կարթախենա:Կարթախենա
Նջամենա:Նջամենա
Սիեռա\ Մորենա:Սիեռա\ Մորենա
Ուկրաինա:Ուկրաինա
Պեմբինա:Պեմբինա
Մեդինա:Մեդինա
Բերեզինա:Բերեզինա
Պենժինա:Պենժինա
Իգնալինա:Իգնալինա
Ժիլինա:Ժիլինա
Կարոլինա:Կարոլինա
Ստարա\ Պլանինա:Ստարա\ Պլանինա
Գատչինա:Գատչինա
Սինա:Սինա
Տուամասինա:Տուամասինա
Մեսինա:Մեսինա
Դվինա:Դվինա
Հերցեգովինա:Հերցեգովինա
Բուկովինա:Բուկովինա
Օստրավա-Կարվինա:Օստրավա-Կարվինա
Կոնստանտինա:Կոնստանտինա
Արգենտինա:Արգենտինա
Պրիշտինա:Պրիշտինա
Սանտա\ Կատարինա:Սանտա\ Կատարինա
Դրինա:Դրինա
Կհուլնա:Կհուլնա
Բալախնա:Բալախնա
Դեհնա:Դեհնա
Ջամնա:Ջամնա
Կոլոմնա:Կոլոմնա
Ռիջայնա:Ռիջայնա
Վիեննա:Վիեննա
Ռավեննա:Ռավեննա
Կրիշնա:Կրիշնա
Արիզոնա:Արիզոնա
Սուխոնա:Սուխոնա
Անկոնա:Անկոնա
Վերոնա:Վերոնա
Վառնա:Վառնա
Դեսնա:Դեսնա
Բոսնա:Բոսնա
Շեքսնա:Շեքսնա
Պատնա:Պատնա
Էտնա:Էտնա
Ցնա:Ցնա
Կադունա:Կադունա
Պունա:Պունա
Սունա:Սունա
Էսկիլստունա:Էսկիլստունա
Ֆուտունա:Ֆուտունա
Կիրունա:Կիրունա
Կարլսկրունա:Կարլսկրունա
Աշա:Աշա
Կանդալակշա:Կանդալակշա
Մոկշա:Մոկշա
Կոստոմուկշա:Կոստոմուկշա
Չանշա:Չանշա
Վիտոշա:Վիտոշա
Օրշա:Օրշա
Բուրգոա:Բուրգոա
Մաունա\ Լոա:Մաունա\ Լոա
Սամոա:Սամոա
Ժուան\ Պեսոա:Ժուան\ Պեսոա
Լաչա:Լաչա
Ավաչա:Ավաչա
Պուշչա:Պուշչա
Անապա:Անապա
Տեգուսիգալպա:Տեգուսիգալպա
Թամպա:Թամպա
Պամպա:Պամպա
Ուեյպա:Ուեյպա
Եվրոպա:Եվրոպա
Պրեսպա:Պրեսպա
Կուլջա:Կուլջա
Սելեմջա:Սելեմջա
Գյանջա:Գյանջա
Տունջա:Տունջա
Կամբոջա:Կամբոջա
Դոբրուջա:Դոբրուջա
Կանբեռա:Կանբեռա
Մոմբասա:Մոմբասա
Լհասա:Լհասա
Կինշասա:Կինշասա
Օդեսա:Օդեսա
Իսա:Իսա
Ղարաքիլիսա:Ղարաքիլիսա
Տիսա:Տիսա
Օրիսա:Օրիսա
Թալսա:Թալսա
Ֆրանսա:Ֆրանսա
Սարագոսա:Սարագոսա
Մենդոսա:Մենդոսա
Կոստրոսա:Կոստրոսա
Կորսա:Կորսա
Բուրսա:Բուրսա
Ուսա:Ուսա
Մուսա:Մուսա
Ստարայա\ Ռուսա:Ստարայա\ Ռուսա
Բրուսա:Բրուսա
Լիբավա:Լիբավա
Սումբավա:Սումբավա
Ասահիգավա:Ասահիգավա
Ելգավա:Ելգավա
Դաուգավա:Դաուգավա
Վինդավա:Վինդավա
Բրատիսլավա:Բրատիսլավա
Կանաձավա:Կանաձավա
Ճավա:Ճավա
Շումավա:Շումավա
Օկինավա:Օկինավա
Դաշավա:Դաշավա
Վարշավա:Վարշավա
Սուչավա:Սուչավա
Օպավա:Օպավա
Սավա:Սավա
Միտավա:Միտավա
Պոլտավա:Պոլտավա
Վլտավա:Վլտավա
Օտտավա:Օտտավա
Տարավա:Տարավա
Դրավա:Դրավա
Մորավա:Մորավա
Մորավսկա\ Օստրավա:Մորավսկա\ Օստրավա
Լոզվա:Լոզվա
Բիվա:Բիվա
Խիվա:Խիվա
Ուելվա:Ուելվա
Մոսկվա:Մոսկվա
Կուշվա:Կուշվա
Մոլդովա:Մոլդովա
Կորդովա:Կորդովա
Մոնկլովա:Մոնկլովա
Չենստոխովա:Չենստոխովա
Այովա:Այովա
Կրայովա:Կրայովա
Ասկանիա\ Նովա:Ասկանիա\ Նովա
Լիսվա:Լիսվա
Սոսվա:Սոսվա
Լիտվա:Լիտվա
Գարվա:Գարվա
Սուվա:Սուվա
Տուվա:Տուվա
Տանու\ Տուվա:Տանու\ Տուվա
Տոբատա:Տոբատա
Լա\ Պլատա:Լա\ Պլատա
Մար\ դել\ Պլատա:Մար\ դել\ Պլատա
Չուքիկամատա:Չուքիկամատա
Կարիմատա:Կարիմատա
Սունտար\ Խայատա:Սունտար\ Խայատա
Վալետա:Վալետա
Խետա:Խետա
Մետա:Մետա
Մեսետա:Մեսետա
Ակիտա:Ակիտա
Չիտա:Չիտա
Կարա-Բալտա:Կարա-Բալտա
Կյախտա:Կյախտա
Ուխտա:Ուխտա
Ատլանտա:Ատլանտա
Լապենռանտա:Լապենռանտա
Տանտա:Տանտա
Վենտա:Վենտա
Ինտա:Ինտա
Մահարաշտա:Մահարաշտա
Ալուշտա:Ալուշտա
Բոգոտա:Բոգոտա
Կոտա:Կոտա
Դակոտա:Դակոտա
Մինեսոտա:Մինեսոտա
Անտոֆագաստա:Անտոֆագաստա
Օգաստա:Օգաստա
Մացեստա:Մացեստա
Էլիստա:Էլիստա
Մստա:Մստա
Ֆամագուստա:Ֆամագուստա
Լա\ Վալետտա:Լա\ Վալետտա
Ջակարտա:Ջակարտա
Ջոկարտա:Ջոկարտա
Վարտա:Վարտա
Ալբերտա:Ալբերտա
Սեուտա:Սեուտա
Վորկուտա:Վորկուտա
Անգարա:Անգարա
Սեարա:Սեարա
Քաթթարա:Քաթթարա
Հոնիարա:Հոնիարա
Կլարա:Կլարա
Գվադալախարա:Գվադալախարա
Բուխարա:Բուխարա
Կարա:Կարա
Անկարա:Անկարա
Սահարա:Սահարա
Ջիզակի\ Մարա:Ջիզակի\ Մարա
Սամարա:Սամարա
Ասմարա:Ասմարա
Մարմարա:Մարմարա
Հունեդոարա:Հունեդոարա
Տիմիշոարա:Տիմիշոարա
Պարա:Պարա
Կառարա:Կառարա
Ֆեռարա:Ֆեռարա
Աստարա:Աստարա
Ագրա:Ագրա
Գագրա:Գագրա
Վիտեգրա:Վիտեգրա
Գոգրա:Գոգրա
Սիդրա:Սիդրա
Իմանդրա:Իմանդրա
Օդրա:Օդրա
Գերա:Գերա
Կագերա:Կագերա
Կորդիլիերա:Կորդիլիերա
Ռիվիերա:Ռիվիերա
Հալմահերա:Հալմահերա
Վիշերա:Վիշերա
Բիրա:Բիրա
Իտաբիրա:Իտաբիրա
Սեխիրա:Սեխիրա
Կերկիրա:Կերկիրա
Կաշիրա:Կաշիրա
Օչամչիրա:Օչամչիրա
Գհագհրա:Գհագհրա
Բեյրա:Բեյրա
Մադեյրա:Մադեյրա
Բանդեյրա:Բանդեյրա
Ստարա\ Զագորա:Ստարա\ Զագորա
Իորա:Իորա
Վլյորա:Վլյորա
Պեչորա:Պեչորա
Մեշչորա:Մեշչորա
Բասրա:Բասրա
Իմատրա:Իմատրա
Սումատրա:Սումատրա
Պատրա:Պատրա
Տատրա:Տատրա
Սոկոտրա:Սոկոտրա
Բրահմապուտրա:Բրահմապուտրա
Անդորրա:Անդորրա
Հաուրա:Հաուրա
Բուժումբուրա:Բուժումբուրա
Ուսումբուրա:Ուսումբուրա
Ելենյա\ Գուրա:Ելենյա\ Գուրա
Զելյոնա\ Գուրա:Զելյոնա\ Գուրա
Մադուրա:Մադուրա
Էստրեմադուրա:Էստրեմադուրա
Ճիաթուրա:Ճիաթուրա
Կոկուրա:Կոկուրա
Մուրա:Մուրա
Թաննուրա:Թաննուրա
Ռաս\ Թաննուրա:Ռաս\ Թաննուրա
Թեմիր\ Խան\ Շուրա:Թեմիր\ Խան\ Շուրա
Ժապուրա:Ժապուրա
Տրիպուրա:Տրիպուրա
Սուրա:Սուրա
Տուրա:Տուրա
Օյրոթ-Տուրա:Օյրոթ-Տուրա
Շատուրա:Շատուրա
Բուենավենտուրա:Բուենավենտուրա
Աքրա:Աքրա
Պրացա:Պրացա
Մեդվեդիցա:Մեդվեդիցա
Ռեժիցա:Ռեժիցա
Ռիբնիցա:Ռիբնիցա
Լեգնիցա:Լեգնիցա
Զենիցա:Զենիցա
Վիննիցա:Վիննիցա
Ռեշիցա:Ռեշիցա
Ռեչիցա:Ռեչիցա
Ռիցա:Ռիցա
Սուբոտիցա:Սուբոտիցա
Մարիցա:Մարիցա
Բիստրիցա:Բիստրիցա
Բանսկա\ Բիստրիցա:Բանսկա\ Բիստրիցա
Բառանքիլցա:Բառանքիլցա
Կոնստանցա:Կոնստանցա
Մոնցա:Մոնցա
Չիուաուա:Չիուաուա
Ակոնկագուա:Ակոնկագուա
Մանագուա:Մանագուա
Անտիգուա:Անտիգուա
Պադուա:Պադուա
Պապուա:Պապուա
Շառլեռուա:Շառլեռուա
Ավարուա:Ավարուա
Թրուա:Թրուա
Արփա:Արփա
Դաքքա:Դաքքա
Մեքքա:Մեքքա
Աղստաֆա:Աղստաֆա
Ջուլֆա:Ջուլֆա
Հայֆա:Հայֆա
Նուկուալոֆա:Նուկուալոֆա
Ուֆա:Ուֆա
Մուրգաբ:Մուրգաբ
Տրիմաբ:Տրիմաբ
Կուլյաբ:Կուլյաբ
Չենաբ:Չենաբ
Փանջաբ:Փանջաբ
Փենջաբ:Փենջաբ
Ասաբ:Ասաբ
Շատտ\ էլ-Արաբ:Շատտ\ էլ-Արաբ
Բաբ\ էլ-Մանդեբ:Բաբ\ էլ-Մանդեբ
Ցումեբ:Ցումեբ
Զագրեբ:Զագրեբ
Մաղրիբ:Մաղրիբ
Ալբ:Ալբ
Վարզոբ:Վարզոբ
Սուրխոբ:Սուրխոբ
Գոտհոբ:Գոտհոբ
Դանուբ:Դանուբ
Վարշավա\ Վաոուբ:Վարշավա\ Վաոուբ
Վաոօբ:Վաոօբ
Վեդի\ Վաոօբ:Վեդի\ Վաոօբ
Ուլուգմուզտագ:Ուլուգմուզտագ
Տառնոբժեգ:Տառնոբժեգ
Վինիպեգ:Վինիպեգ
Վիգ:Վիգ
Դանցիգ:Դանցիգ
Լայպցիգ:Լայպցիգ
Բրաունշվայգ:Բրաունշվայգ
Բաթամբանգ:Բաթամբանգ
Պալեմբանգ:Պալեմբանգ
Ուջունգպանդանգ:Ուջունգպանդանգ
Դանանգ:Դանանգ
Պինանգ:Պինանգ
Դապսանգ:Դապսանգ
Սեմարանգ:Սեմարանգ
Ռեդինգ:Ռեդինգ
Դարջիլինգ:Դարջիլինգ
Դառլինգ:Դառլինգ
Վայոմինգ:Վայոմինգ
Լինչյոպինգ:Լինչյոպինգ
Նորչյոպինգ:Նորչյոպինգ
Լանսինգ:Լանսինգ
Չիտագոնգ:Չիտագոնգ
Ուոլոնգոնգ:Ուոլոնգոնգ
Վուլոնգոնգ:Վուլոնգոնգ
Դը\ Լոնգ:Դը\ Լոնգ
Էլբլոնգ:Էլբլոնգ
Մեկոնգ:Մեկոնգ
Հոնկոնգ:Հոնկոնգ
Բանդունգ:Բանդունգ
Բելիտունգ:Բելիտունգ
Կրիվոյ\ Ռոգ:Կրիվոյ\ Ռոգ
Տագանռոգ:Տագանռոգ
Խորոգ:Խորոգ
Հայդելբերգ:Հայդելբերգ
Բադեն-Վյուրտեմբերգ:Բադեն-Վյուրտեմբերգ
Ֆրայբերգ:Ֆրայբերգ
Վիտտենբերգ:Վիտտենբերգ
Քյոնիգսբերգ:Քյոնիգսբերգ
Էսբյերգ:Էսբյերգ
Հելսինգբորգ:Հելսինգբորգ
Վիբորգ:Վիբորգ
Օլբորգ:Օլբորգ
Բյոյտենզորգ:Բյոյտենզորգ
Մագդեբուրգ:Մագդեբուրգ
Գյոթեբուրգ:Գյոթեբուրգ
Շլիսելբուրգ:Շլիսելբուրգ
Համբուրգ:Համբուրգ
Լյուքսեմբուրգ:Լյուքսեմբուրգ
Ֆրայբուրգ:Ֆրայբուրգ
Բրանդենբուրգ:Բրանդենբուրգ
Օրենբուրգ:Օրենբուրգ
Էդինբուրգ:Էդինբուրգ
Եկատերինբուրգ:Եկատերինբուրգ
Ստրասբուրգ:Ստրասբուրգ
Դույսբուրգ:Դույսբուրգ
Ռեգենսբուրգ:Ռեգենսբուրգ
Աուգոսբուրգ:Աուգոսբուրգ
Փիտսբուրգ:Փիտսբուրգ
Վոլֆսբուրգ:Վոլֆսբուրգ
Պետերբուրգ:Պետերբուրգ
Սանկտ\ Պետերբուրգ:Սանկտ\ Պետերբուրգ
Ինստերբուրգ:Ինստերբուրգ
Զալցբուրգ:Զալցբուրգ
Բուգ:Բուգ
Դնեպր-Բուգ:Դնեպր-Բուգ
Ուստյուգ:Ուստյուգ
Վելիկի\ Ուստյուգ:Վելիկի\ Ուստյուգ
Կրեմենչուգ:Կրեմենչուգ
Ջալալ-Աբադ:Ջալալ-Աբադ
Ահմադաբադ:Ահմադաբադ
Ֆեյսալաբադ:Ֆեյսալաբադ
Աշխաբադ:Աշխաբադ
Բեկաբադ:Բեկաբադ
Իլահաբադ:Իլահաբադ
Ալլահաբադ:Ալլահաբադ
Իսլամաբադ:Իսլամաբադ
Ստալինաբադ:Ստալինաբադ
Լենինաբադ:Լենինաբադ
Կիրովաբադ:Կիրովաբադ
Հայդարաբադ:Հայդարաբադ
Սաբիրաբադ:Սաբիրաբադ
Սվալբադ:Սվալբադ
Կարլսբադ:Կարլսբադ
Օրդուբադ:Օրդուբադ
Տրինիդադ:Տրինիդադ
Բաղդադ:Բաղդադ
Ռիադ:Ռիադ
Էր-Ռիադ:Էր-Ռիադ
Մաշհադ:Մաշհադ
Էլ-Աբյադ:Էլ-Աբյադ
Բահր\ էլ-Աբյադ:Բահր\ էլ-Աբյադ
Թամիլնադ:Թամիլնադ
Փանջնադ:Փանջնադ
Չադ:Չադ
Պոսադ:Պոսադ
Պավլովսկի\ Պոսադ:Պավլովսկի\ Պոսադ
Վիլեմատադ:Վիլեմատադ
Կարլ\ Մարքս\ Շտադ:Կարլ\ Մարքս\ Շտադ
Դարմշտադ:Դարմշտադ
Այզենհյուտտենշտադ:Այզենհյուտտենշտադ
Կրոնշտադ:Կրոնշտադ
Կապշտադ:Կապշտադ
Արադ:Արադ
Բլաոևգրադ:Բլաոևգրադ
Բելգրադ:Բելգրադ
Ստալինգրադ:Ստալինգրադ
Լենինգրադ:Լենինգրադ
Կալինինգրադ:Կալինինգրադ
Վոլգոգրադ:Վոլգոգրադ
Պավլոգրադ:Պավլոգրադ
Զելենոգրադ:Զելենոգրադ
Ցելինոգրադ:Ցելինոգրադ
Չերվոնոգրադ:Չերվոնոգրադ
Կիրովոգրադ:Կիրովոգրադ
Տիտոգրադ:Տիտոգրադ
Պետրոգրադ:Պետրոգրադ
Վորոշիլովգրադ:Վորոշիլովգրադ
Դիմիտրովգրադ:Դիմիտրովգրադ
Ելիզավետգրադ:Ելիզավետգրադ
Սպորադ:Սպորադ
Դեբեդ:Դեբեդ
Սեգեդ:Սեգեդ
Շվեդ:Շվեդ
Եզդ:Եզդ
Օզդ:Օզդ
Պորտ\ Սաիդ:Պորտ\ Սաիդ
Վալյադոլիդ:Վալյադոլիդ
Դիոմիդ:Դիոմիդ
